Hawaii statutes.
§484-8.6 Final order of registration.
(a) If the subdivider has obtained a preliminary order of registration, then
upon the issuance of final subdivision approval of the subdivision by the
county in which the land is situated, the subdivider shall submit to the
director an application for a final order of registration, which application
shall contain, among other things:

(1) A copy of the subdivision map for the subdivision
and evidence satisfactory to the director that final subdivision approval has been
granted by the county; and

(2) A written statement disclosing any material
changes to the subdivision which may have occurred between the date of
preliminary subdivision approval and the date of final subdivision approval or
a statement that no changes have occurred.

Upon receipt of the subdivider's application,
the director shall enter a final order of registration or rejection, pursuant
to section 484-8.

(b) As a condition to issuing a final order of
registration for a subdivision with respect to which a preliminary order was
entered, the director may require that the subdivider amend the public offering
statement to provide fair and full disclosures to the purchasers of any
material changes to the subdivision.

The amended public offering statements shall be
delivered to the purchaser either personally or by certified or registered mail
with return receipt requested, and at the same time the purchaser shall be
notified in writing of the purchaser's right of refund and cancellation of
obligation and the waiver of such right upon the purchaser's failure to act
within a seven-day period. Each purchaser shall have a right to cancel the
sales contract signed by the purchaser and receive a refund of all sums paid by
the purchaser, without penalty, within the seven-day period from the date of
delivery of the amended public offering statement, after which period such
right shall be deemed waived.

(c) If the final order of registration is not
issued within one year from the date of entry of the preliminary order, each
purchaser shall have a right to cancel the sales contract signed by the
purchaser and receive a refund of all sums paid by the purchaser; provided that
if the final order is issued after the one-year period and a written notice is
delivered to the purchaser either personally or by certified or registered mail
with return receipt requested, notifying the purchaser of the issuance of the
final order of registration and of the purchaser's right of refund and
cancellation of obligation and the waiver of such right upon the purchaser's
failure to act within a seven-day period, which notice shall be accompanied by
any amended public offering statement required under subsection (b), the
purchaser shall have seven days from the date of delivery of the notice to
exercise the purchaser's right of refund and cancellation of obligation, after
which period such right shall be deemed waived.

(d) The requirements of subsections (b) and
(c) shall apply only to purchasers who sign a binding sales contract before the
issuance of a final order of registration. The requirements of subsections (b)
and (c) do not apply to prospective purchasers holding a reservation agreement
which may be canceled at the request of the purchaser at any time prior to the
execution by the prospective purchaser of a sales contract, or to persons who
sign a sales contract or reservation agreement after the issuance of a final
order by the director. [L 1983, c 175, pt of §8; am L 1992, c 132, §9]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next